Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1345
Statute of limitations.

An action to recognize a foreign-country judgment must be commenced within the earlier of the time during which the foreign-country judgment is effective in the foreign country or fifteen years from the date that the foreign-country judgment became effective in the foreign country.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 9.